th: การรับรองความปลอดภัยของของเล่น: ASTM F963; ปลอดสาร BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; สอดคล้องตามมาตรฐาน CPSIA; EN 71; ปลอดสารพทาเลท; RoHS; UKCA; อื่นๆ
nb: Sikkerhetssertifisering for leke: ASTM F963; BPA-fri; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA-kompatibel; EN 71; Ftalatfri; RoHS; UKCA; Annet
ro-RO: Certificare de siguranță pentru jucării: ASTM F963; Fără BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Conform CPSIA; EN 71; Fără ftalați; RoHS; UKCA; Altele
nl: Veiligheidscertificering speelgoed: ASTM F963; BPA-vrij; CA Prop 65; CE; Voldoet aan CPSIA; EN 71; Ftalaatvrij; RoHS; UKCA; Overig
hr-HR: Certifikacija sigurnosti igračke: ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; U skladu s CPSIA; EN 71; Bez ftalata; RoHS; UKCA; Ostalo
zh-TW: 玩具安全認證: ASTM F963; 不含 BPA; CA Prop 65 (加州第 65 號法案); CE; 符合 CPSIA 規範; EN 71; 不含鄰苯二甲酸酯; RoHS; UKCA; 其他
lt-LT: Žaislų saugos sertifikatas: ASTM F963; Be BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Atitinka CPSIA; EN 71; Be ftalatų; RoHS; UKCA; Kita
bg-BG: Сертификация за безопасност на играчки: ASTM F963; Без BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Съвместимост с CPSIA; EN 71; Без фталати; RoHS; UKCA; Друго
es: Certificación de seguridad de juguetes: ASTM F963; Sin BPA; Propuesta 65 de California; CE; Cumple con CPSIA; EN 71; Sin ftalatos; RoHS; UKCA; Otro
pt-PT: Certificação de segurança do brinquedo: ASTM F963; Sem BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Em conformidade com a norma CPSIA; EN 71; Sem ftalatos; RoHS; UKCA; Outro
vi: Chứng nhận an toàn đồ chơi: ASTM F963; Không chứa BPA; Đạo luật Prop 65 của California; CE; Tuân thủ CPSIA; EN 71; Không chứa phthalate; RoHS; UKCA; Khác
ru: Сертификация безопасности игрушек: ASTM F963; Без BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Соответствует требованиям CPSIA; EN 71; Без фталатов; RoHS; UKCA; Другое
it: Certificazione di sicurezza dei giocattoli: ASTM F963; Senza BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Conforme a CPSIA; EN 71; Senza ftalati; RoHS; UKCA; Altro
sk-SK: Bezpečnostná certifikácia hračky: ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; V súlade s CPSIA; EN 71; Bez ftalátov; RoHS; UKCA; Iné
sl-SI: Varnostna certifikacija igrače: ASTM F963; Brez BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Skladno s CPSIA; EN 71; Brez ftalatov; RoHS; UKCA; Drugo
en: Toy safety certification: ASTM F963; BPA-free; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA compliant; EN 71; Phthalate-free; RoHS; UKCA; Other
sv: Säkerhetscertifiering för leksak: ASTM F963; BPA-fri; CA Prop 65; CE; Följer CPSIA; EN 71; Ftalatfri; RoHS; UKCA; Övrigt
fi: Lelun turvallisuussertifikaatti: ASTM F963; BPA-vapaa; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA-yhteensopiva; EN 71; Ftalaatiton; RoHS; UKCA; Muu
fr: Certification de sécurité des jouets: ASTM F963; Sans BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Conforme à la CPSIA; EN 71; Sans phtalates; RoHS; UKCA; Autre
ja: トイ安全認証: ASTM F963; BPA フリー; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA 準拠; EN 71; フタル酸エステル不使用; RoHS; UKCA; その他
hu: Játék biztonsági besorolása: ASTM F963; BPA-mentes; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA-megfelelő; EN 71; Ftalátmentes; RoHS; UKCA; Egyéb
zh-CN: 玩具安全认证: ASTM F963; 不含 BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; 符合 CPSIA 要求; EN 71; 不含邻苯二甲酸盐; RoHS; UKCA; 其他
pt-BR: Certificado de segurança do brinquedo: ASTM F963; Livre de BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Compatível com CPSIA; EN 71; Livre de ftalatos; RoHS; UKCA; Outros
pl: Certyfikat bezpieczeństwa zabawki: ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Zgodność z CPSIA; EN 71; Bez ftalanów; RoHS; UKCA; Inne
da: Sikkerhedscertificering for legetøj: ASTM F963; BPA-fri; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA-kompatibel; EN 71; Ftalatfri; RoHS; UKCA; Andet
ko: 완구 안전 인증: ASTM F963; BPA 프리; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA 준수; EN 71; 프탈레이트 프리; RoHS; UKCA; 기타
tr: Oyuncak güvenlik sertifikasyonu: ASTM F963; BPA içermez; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA uyumlu; EN 71; Ftalat içermez; RoHS; UKCA; Diğer
cs: Bezpečnostní certifikace hraček: ASTM F963; Bez BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; V souladu s CPSIA; EN 71; Bez ftalátů; RoHS; UKCA; Jiné
el: Πιστοποίηση ασφάλειας παιχνιδιού: ASTM F963; Χωρίς BPA; CA Prop 65; CE; Συμβατότητα CPSIA; EN 71; Χωρίς φθαλικές ενώσεις; RoHS; UKCA; Άλλο
de: Sicherheitszertifizierung des Spielzeugs: ASTM F963; BPA-frei; CA Prop 65; CE; CPSIA-konform; EN 71; Phthalatfrei; RoHS; UKCA; Sonstiges